Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-517
Department of
Health and Human Services; report; public record.

(1)
The Department of Health and Human Services shall provide a report to the
Governor and the Legislature no later than December 1 each year regarding
the data and information collected pursuant to section 43-516, including a
summary of such data and information. The
report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

(2) The data and information collected under such section
shall be considered a public record under section 84-712.01.

Laws 2012, LB842, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 8.